District of Columbia statutes.
39-113

Competitive process for performance of work.

Within 60 days of approval of a strategic plan by the Board of Library Trustees pursuant to § 39-111, the Mayor shall initiate a competitive process for the performance of the work described in the plan. The Mayor shall issue one or more solicitations for competitive sealed bids or competitive sealed proposals for vendors who shall complete the project or projects for a guaranteed price by assembling the necessary team of designers, architects, developers, and other vendors, and posting a performance bond, or obtaining other insurance, to insure that design and time requirements shall be met for the guaranteed price. The Mayor shall consult closely with the Board of Library Trustees in preparing the solicitation or solicitations, and shall include a statement of work or specifications approved by the Board of Library Trustees.

History

June 3, 1896, 29 Stat. 244, ch. 315, § 13
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-78, § 2, 53 DCR 802

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4022(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4022(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).